Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-5] Extension of benefits to persons
ordered to report for state military service. Any person who is ordered to
report for state military service shall be entitled to the relief and benefits
during:

(1) The period of actual military service; and

(2) The period beginning on the date of receipt of
the order and ending on the date upon which the member reports for military
service, or the date on which the order is revoked, whichever is earlier. [L
1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next